Arkansas, session 2025, HB1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-79-169. Coverage for healthcare services provided in mobile units —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirement" means a deductible, coinsurance,
copayment, or any maximum limitation on the application of a deductible,
coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket expense under a health
benefit plan;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, policy,
or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered by a healthcare
insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or
any successor program.
(B) "Health benefit plan" does not include a health
*ANS080*
02-20-2025 11:34:40 ANS080

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1296
benefit plan provided under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq.;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company, a
hospital and medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization,
a risk-based provider organization, or a sponsor of a self-funded health
benefit plan, that:
(i) Is subject to:
(a) The insurance laws of this state;
(b) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(c) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations; or
(ii) For a healthcare insurer in another state:
(a) Is not otherwise exempt from the insurance
laws of this state; and
(b) Has any subscribers in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" includes the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(4) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) A doctor of medicine, a doctor of osteopathy, or
another licensed healthcare professional acting within the professional's
licensed scope of practice; or
(B) A healthcare facility licensed in the state where the
facility is located to provide healthcare services;
(5) "Healthcare service" means a healthcare procedure,
treatment, or service provided by a healthcare provider;
(6) "Mobile unit" means a premanufactured structure, trailer, or
self-propelled unit equipped with a chassis on wheels that:
(A) Is intended to provide healthcare services on a
temporary basis; and
(B) Conforms to applicable rules promulgated by the
Department of Health; and
(7) "Subscriber" means an individual who is entitled to receive
healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall provide coverage to a subscriber for a
healthcare service that is:
02-20-2025 11:34:40 ANS080

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 HB1296
(1) Provided in a mobile unit;
(2) Billed by a healthcare provider using the place-of-service
code designated for a mobile unit; and
(3) Otherwise covered by the healthcare insurer in another place
of service.
(c) A healthcare insurer shall ensure that a subscriber's cost-sharing
requirement for a healthcare service that is provided in a mobile unit is no
less favorable than the cost-sharing requirement that is applicable to the
same healthcare service provided in another place of service.

/s/L. Johnson

























02-20-2025 11:34:40 ANS080